Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-355
Installment loan; liability of other parties.

(1) No individual, other than the spouse of the borrower, is obligated as a cosigner, comaker, guarantor, endorser, surety, or similar party with respect to a loan unless, before or contemporaneously with signing any separate agreement of loan or any writing setting forth the terms of the borrower's agreement, the individual receives a separate written notice that contains a completed identification of the loan the individual may have to pay and reasonably informs the individual of the obligation with respect to it.

(2) Such notice shall be in the form prescribed by the department.

(3) An individual entitled to notice under this section shall also be given a copy of any writing setting forth the terms of the borrower's agreement and of any separate agreement of obligation signed by the individual entitled to the notice.

Laws 2012, LB965, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 76.